Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE B. STATE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 652. VACANCIES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 652.001. TERM OF APPOINTMENT TO VACANCY. An appointment made by the governor to a vacancy in the office of a commissioner, commission, or board created by law is for the unexpired term, unless otherwise provided by law.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER B. PROHIBITIONS ON FILLING VACANCIES

Sec. 652.021. SCOPE OF SUBCHAPTER. (a) This subchapter applies to a vacancy in a state or district office that is to be filled by appointment by the governor.

(b) For purposes of this subchapter, the expiration of a state or district officer's term of office creates a vacancy in the office.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 652.022. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "transition period" means the period beginning on November 1 preceding the day of a general election for the office of governor and ending on the day the individual elected governor, or the individual's successor if the individual elected governor is unable to serve, takes office as governor.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 652.023. PROHIBITION AGAINST FILLING CERTAIN VACANCIES. An incumbent governor may not, during the transition period, appoint an individual to fill a vacancy that occurred before the beginning of the transition period.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 652.024. EXCEPTIONS. Section 652.023 does not apply to:

(1) an incumbent governor if the secretary of state proclaims that, according to the secretary's count of returns from the general election, the governor is reelected; or

(2) a vacancy that:

(A) first occurs after October 1 preceding the transition period and before the transition period begins;

(B) is caused by the death of the officeholder; and

(C) would not have occurred during the period described by Paragraph (A) by the expiration of the officeholder's term of office.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 652.025. APPOINTMENT VOID. An appointment made in violation of Section 652.023 is void.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 652.026. VACANCY DURING TRANSITION PERIOD. (a) If a vacancy first occurs during the transition period, the incumbent governor may appoint an individual to fill the vacancy only for a partial term expiring February 1 following the occurrence of the vacancy.

(b) This section does not apply to:

(1) a vacancy for which Article V of the Texas Constitution prescribes a different term; or

(2) an appointee of an incumbent governor if the secretary of state proclaims that, according to the secretary's count of the returns from the general election, the governor is reelected.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.